North Carolina, session 2025, HB302.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Section 1 of Chapter 193 of the 1987 Session Laws, as amended by
Section 2(a) of S.L. 2013-318 and Section 3(a) of S.L. 2013-318, reads as rewritten:
"Section 1. Beginning in December 2014, the Pitt County Board of Education shall consist
of nine members. Nine members Members of the Board of Education shall be elected on a
partisan basis, as provided in G.S. 163-291, at the time of the general election in each
even-numbered year as terms expire. Candidates for election to the Board of Education shall be
nominated at the same time and manner as other county officers. Members shall take office on
the first Monday in December following the election. Members shall serve until a successor has
been elected and qualified. Except as otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in
accordance with Chapters 115C and 163 of the General Statutes. Members shall be elected from
single-member districts, as described in Section 5. Only voters residing in the district may vote
for the member from that district."
SECTION 1.(b) Section 6 of Chapter 193 of the 1987 Session Laws reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 6. Vacancies on the Board shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members of
the Board. The person appointed shall serve until the next regularly scheduled election for county
boards of education, at which time a person shall be elected to fill the remainder of the unexpired
term or, if the term is due to expire that year, a new term. in accordance with G.S. 115C-37.1.
The person appointed to fill a vacancy must reside in the same district as the departing member."
SECTION 1.(c) This section does not affect the term of office of any member elected
in 2022 or 2024 to the Pitt County Board of Education. The members of the Pitt County Board
of Education elected in 2022 and 2024, or any member appointed to fill a vacancy for the
remainder of an unexpired term for a member elected in 2022 or 2024, shall serve until a
successor has been elected and qualified. Any vacancy on the Pitt County Board of Education
for a member elected in 2022 and 2024 shall be filled by appointment by the remaining members
of the Board.
SECTION 1.(d) This section is effective when it becomes law and applies beginning
with elections held on or after that date.
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 115C-37.1(d) reads as rewritten:
"(d) This section shall apply only to the Hickory City Board of Education and the
Newton-Conover City Board of Education and in the following counties: Alleghany, Ashe,
*H302-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
Beaufort, Brunswick, Burke, Cabarrus, Caldwell, Carteret, Catawba, Cherokee, Clay, Craven,
Dare, Davie, Forsyth, Graham, Harnett, Henderson, Hyde, Iredell, Lee, Lincoln, Madison,
McDowell, Mitchell, New Hanover, Onslow, Pamlico, Pender, Pitt, Polk, Rutherford, Stanly,
Stokes, Surry, Vance, Washington, and Yancey."
SECTION 2.(b) This section becomes effective December 1, 2026.
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided by this act, this act is effective when it
becomes law.
Page 2 House Bill 302-First Edition